Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 4 Legislative Services

28-4-1.
Legislative Services Committee; creation; membership; compensation; meetings.

There is created the Legislative Services Committee, hereinafter called the committee, to be composed of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate, the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson of the Banking and Financial Institutions Committee of the Senate, the chairperson of the Ways and Means Committee of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives, the majority leader of the Senate, the majority leader of the House of Representatives, the minority leader of the Senate, the minority leader of the House of Representatives, the Secretary of the Senate, and the Clerk of the House of Representatives. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be chairperson of the committee, and the Secretary of the Senate shall be secretary of the committee.

The members of the committee shall receive no additional allowances for service on the committee while the General Assembly is in session; but, for each day spent in the performance of their duties under this chapter between sessions, the members shall receive the allowances authorized by law for legislative members of interim legislative committees.

The committee shall meet at least twice during each calendar year. Additional meetings may be held upon the call of the chairperson or upon the call of a majority of the members of the committee. Nine members of the committee shall constitute a quorum and the affirmative vote of a majority of those members present at a meeting of the committee, provided such members present constitute a quorum, shall be necessary to transact business of the committee. The chairperson shall be entitled to vote on all matters requiring a vote of the committee.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 152, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 230, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 176, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 795, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 722, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 359, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 366, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 5, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 933, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 865, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, “Banking and Financial Institutions” was substituted for “Banking and and Financial Institutions” near the middle of the first sentence in subsection (a).

28-4-2.
General powers and duties of the Legislative Services Committee.

The committee is empowered to:

Study and adopt methods and procedures to operate more efficiently the General Assembly and each house thereof;

Study and adopt methods and procedures to make more uniform the operations of the Senate and the House of Representatives;

Exercise general supervision of the operation of the legislative branch of government and act for and enter into contracts on behalf of agencies of the legislative branch, the General Assembly, and each house thereof;

Provide for services for the legislative branch of government; and

Delegate such of its powers and authority as it deems advisable.

The committee shall have complete control, authority, and jurisdiction over the rooms, chambers, offices, and other areas on the third and fourth floors of the state capitol building and on the mezzanine between the third and fourth floors. All assignments for the use of such rooms, chambers, offices, and other areas by the General Assembly, the Senate, the House of Representatives, committees of the Senate and the House, members of the Senate and the House, and agencies, officials, and employees of the legislative branch of government shall be made by the committee or under such procedure as the committee shall provide. Any assignment shall be subject to change by the committee. Use of any such room, chamber, office, or other area, other than as provided above, shall be under such procedure as the committee shall provide.

The committee is authorized to provide for the maintenance, repair, construction, renovation, refurbishing, and furnishing of the rooms, offices, and other areas which are under the control, authority, and jurisdiction of the committee or which have been assigned jointly to the Senate and House of Representatives. The Senate is authorized to provide for the maintenance, repair, construction, renovation, refurbishing, and furnishing of the rooms, chamber, offices, and other areas which are under the control, authority, and jurisdiction of the Senate and the House of Representatives is authorized to provide for the maintenance, repair, construction, renovation, refurbishing, and furnishing of the rooms, chamber, offices, and other areas which are under the control, authority, and jurisdiction of the House of Representatives. Any repair, construction, or renovation by the committee, the Senate, or the House of Representatives in an amount exceeding $5,000.00 shall be accomplished on a competitive bid basis unless such repair, construction, or renovation is accomplished by a state agency or authority. The committee, the Senate, and the House of Representatives shall provide for competitive bids. The committee, the Senate, and the House of Representatives may provide for emergency repairs other than by competitive bids.

The committee shall provide for the procurement of supplies, materials, and equipment which are required jointly for the Senate and House of Representatives. The Senate shall provide for the procurement of supplies, materials, and equipment for the Senate and the House of Representatives shall provide for the procurement of supplies, materials, and equipment for the House of Representatives. Such procurement by the committee, the Senate, and the House of Representatives may be accomplished through a state-wide contract which has been approved by the Department of Administrative Services — Purchasing Division and which was entered into as a result of competitive bids. Procurement may also be accomplished through the Department of Administrative Services — Central Supply. All other procurement of supplies, materials, and equipment in an amount exceeding $3,000.00 on any single order shall be accomplished by competitive bids. The committee, the Senate, and the House of Representatives shall provide for competitive bids. The committee, the Senate, and the House of Representatives may provide for emergency procurement of supplies, materials, and equipment without competitive bids. The committee, the Senate, and the House of Representatives may provide for the emergency repair of equipment without competitive bids.

The committee shall contract with a licensed certified public accountant or certified public accounting firm to conduct annually in accordance with accepted accounting principles a financial audit of legislative funds and expenditures. Such audit shall detail the expenditures of the following offices of the legislative branch: Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of the Senate, Senate, Speaker of the House of Representatives, Clerk of the House of Representatives, House of Representatives, Office of Legislative Counsel, Office of Legislative Budget Analyst, and Office of Legislative Fiscal Officer.

The committee is authorized to contract with a licensed certified public accountant or certified public accounting firm to perform a management audit of the financial practices and operations of the legislative branch of government and, if the committee deems it advisable, to conduct a performance audit of one or more of the legislative offices listed in subsection (e) of this Code section.

A copy of the minutes of the meetings of the committee and of the audits provided for in this Code section shall be made available for public inspection in the office of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, in the office of the President of the Senate, in the office of the Clerk of the House of Representatives, and in the office of the Secretary of the Senate. Upon the request of a member of the General Assembly, a copy of the minutes of a meeting of the committee shall be sent to such member.

The committee is authorized to provide for such other procedures as it deems advisable for the purpose of carrying out this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 152, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 459, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 176, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 359, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 669, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1046, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references.

Authority of Governor with regard to assignment of space in state capitol, §

50-16-61

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, the spelling of “audit” was corrected near the end of subsection (f).

28-4-3.
Office of Legislative Counsel; creation; qualifications; powers and duties.

There is created the Office of Legislative Counsel. The legislative counsel shall be an attorney skilled and experienced in legislative matters and bill drafting.

It shall be the duty of the legislative counsel to:

Provide bill-drafting services which shall be equally available to every member of the General Assembly; and

Advise and counsel members of the General Assembly on legislative matters.

The legislative counsel is authorized to:

Provide for statutory and Code revision, render opinions, assist standing and interim committees, and perform similar legislative functions;

Perform research, issue reports, and make recommendations as a result thereof;

Exchange information, data, and material with similar agencies in other states;

Provide legal services for the legislative branch of government and, with the approval of the committee or the chairman, to represent the interests of the legislative branch in matters involving litigation; and

With the approval of the committee, provide for advisory committees relative to statutory and Code revision. He or she is authorized to seek the advice and assistance of the State Bar of Georgia, law schools, and individuals and organizations knowledgeable in this field.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, he or she is authorized to engage the services of others, including private counsel, by contract or otherwise, to assist him or her in the performance of his or her duties and is authorized to provide for the payment of fees, compensation, and expenses therefor from legislative funds.

The legislative counsel shall provide for the compiling, indexing, editing, and publication of the Georgia Laws containing the Acts and resolutions of the General Assembly and other appropriate materials. Except as otherwise authorized in Code Section 50-18-2, such Acts and resolutions shall be published in hardbound volumes suitable for retention as permanent records. In the case of any special session of the General Assembly, however, the separate publication and distribution of the Acts and resolutions enacted at that special session may be omitted, and in such case the Acts and resolutions enacted at the special session shall be published and distributed together with those enacted at the subsequent regular session. Distribution of the Georgia Laws shall be carried out by the Secretary of State as provided for in Code Section 45-13-22; and the Secretary of State shall notify the legislative counsel of the numbers of volumes required to carry out such distribution.

The legislative counsel shall have such other authority and duties as the committee may provide.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 152, § 3; Ga. L. 1965, p. 270, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 586, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 635, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 176, §§ 3, 5; Ga. L. 1988, p. 7, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 782, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 28; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 1/SB 388; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 28/HB 323.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “He or she” for “He” in paragraph (c)(5); and in subsection (d), substituted “he or she” for “he”, substituted “him or her” for “him”, and substituted “his or her” for “his”.

Cross references.

Grounds for continuance of case for legislative staff serving as lead counsel, §

9-10-150

.

Duties of legislative counsel with regard to summary of general amendments to Constitution of Georgia, §

21-2-4

.

Service as staff for Code Revision Commission, §

28-9-4

.

Law reviews.

For discussion of history, staffing, procedures, and duties of the Office of Legislative Counsel, see 23 Ga. St. B.J. 114 (1987).

28-4-3.1.
Confidentiality of communications between Office of Legislative Counsel and certain persons.

Communications between the Office of Legislative Counsel and the following persons shall be privileged and confidential: members of the General Assembly, the Lieutenant Governor, and persons acting on behalf of such public officers; and such communications, and records and work product relating to such communications, shall not be subject to inspection or disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 or any other law or under judicial process; provided, however, that this privilege shall not apply where it is waived by the affected public officer or officers. The privilege established under this Code section is in addition to any other constitutional, statutory, or common law privilege.

History.

Code 1981, §

50-18-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 243, § 5; Ga. L. 2012, p. 218, § 2/HB 397; Code 1981, §

28-4-3.1

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 50/HB 323.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, redesignated former Code Section 50-18-75 as present Code Section 28-4-3.1 and substituted “Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50” for “this article” in the middle of the first sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 50(5)/HB 323, redesignated former Code Section 50-18-75 as present Code Section 28-4-3.1.

28-4-4.
Election of legislative counsel.

The Legislative Services Committee shall elect the legislative counsel and a majority vote of the total membership of the committee shall be necessary for such election.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 152, § 4; Ga. L. 1965, p. 270, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 360, § 1.

28-4-5.
Attorney General to serve as advisor to legislative counsel.

The Attorney General shall serve as an advisor to the legislative counsel.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 152, § 10.

28-4-6.
Employment, powers, and duties of legislative fiscal officer.

The Legislative Services Committee is authorized to employ a legislative fiscal officer for the legislative branch of government. The fiscal officer shall act as the bookkeeper-comptroller for the legislative branch of government and shall maintain an account of legislative expenditures and commitments. Such fiscal officer shall maintain an inventory of the equipment, furnishings, and nonexpendable items belonging to the legislative branch. Such fiscal officer shall prepare and sign vouchers pertaining to the expenditure of legislative funds. Such fiscal officer shall prepare and sign all warrants for the expenditure of funds appropriated to and available to the legislative branch of government. Such warrants shall be paid by the fiscal officer, and it shall not be necessary that they be countersigned by the comptroller general. All payments from funds appropriated to the legislative branch of government shall be made by the fiscal officer, and reference in any other law to any other official or person in connection with any duties pertaining to such payments shall be deemed to refer to the fiscal officer; all duties of any such other official or person in connection therewith are transferred to the fiscal officer. The fiscal officer shall be under such bond as the Legislative Services Committee shall prescribe, and the premium thereon shall be paid from funds appropriated to the legislative branch of government. The fiscal officer shall have such other duties as shall be prescribed by the committee.

The legislative fiscal officer is authorized on behalf of the legislative branch to pay any properly authorized invoice which does not exceed $5,000.00. Any invoice which exceeds $5,000.00 may not be paid by such fiscal officer without prior approval from the committee. The committee may provide for such approval to be given at meetings of the committee, or in writing between meetings by a majority of the members of the committee, or in such other manner as the committee may establish. All invoices shall contain in detail a description of the work performed, materials used or purchased, and any other information pertinent to the obligation. Before the fiscal officer may pay any invoice, a requisition or purchase order covering such invoice and signed by the person or persons authorized by the Legislative Services Committee to do so plus evidence of delivery must have been submitted to the fiscal officer. A list of all invoices which have been paid shall be submitted by the fiscal officer to the committee on a monthly basis.

A majority vote of the total membership of the Legislative Services Committee shall be necessary to employ the legislative fiscal officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 152, § 5; Ga. L. 1961, p. 230, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 232, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 67, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 176, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 359, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 366, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-12/HB 529; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 28/HB 79.

28-4-7.
Personnel to assist legislative counsel and legislative fiscal officer; offices and supplies.

The Office of Legislative Counsel and the Office of Legislative Fiscal Officer shall be under the budgetary control of the Legislative Services Committee. The committee shall provide procedures for the employment of personnel to assist the legislative counsel and the legislative fiscal officer; and those two officials and such personnel shall be compensated under such procedure as the committee shall provide. The two officials shall have supervision of personnel in their offices relative to the duties of their employment. The committee shall provide office space for the offices and furnish them with supplies, materials, furniture, furnishings, books, equipment, and services.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 152, § 5; Ga. L. 1976, p. 176, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 359, § 7; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-13/HB 529.

28-4-8.
[Reserved] Merit system for and retirement for personnel; payment of contributions.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 152, § 6, and Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8; repealed by Ga. L. 1985, p. 675, § 1, effective April 1, 1985.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 675, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 1, 1985.

28-4-9.
Source of funds for operation of chapter.

The funds necessary to carry out this chapter shall be paid from the funds provided for the legislative branch of government.

History.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 152, § 8; Ga. L. 1976, p. 176, § 6.